Washington statutes.
RCW 19.94.450

Solid fuels to be sold by weight, cubic measure—Delivery tickets.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, all solid fuels such as, but not limited to, coal, coke, charcoal, broiler chips, pressed fuels and briquets shall be sold by weight.

(2) All solid fuels such as hogged fuel, sawdust and similar industrial fuels may be sold or purchased by cubic measure.

(3) Unless a fuel is delivered to the purchaser in package form, each delivery of such fuel to an individual purchaser must be accompanied by a duplicate delivery ticket with the following information clearly stated, in ink or other indelible marking equipment and, in clarity equal to type or printing:

(a) The name and address of the vendor;

(b) The name and address of the purchaser; and

(c) The weight of the delivery and the gross and tare weights from which the weight is computed, each expressed in pounds.

(4) One of the delivery tickets shall be retained by the vendor and the other shall be delivered to the purchaser at the time of delivery of the fuel, or shall be surrendered, on demand, to the director or the city sealer who, if he or she elects to retain it as evidence, shall issue a weight slip in lieu thereof for delivery to the purchaser.

(5) If the purchaser himself or herself carries away the purchase, the vendor shall be required only to give to the purchaser at the time of sale a delivery ticket stating the number of pounds of fuel delivered.

[ 1992 c 237 s 28; 1991 sp.s. c 23 s 19; 1969 c 67 s 45.]

NOTES:

Legislative findings—Intent—1991 sp.s. c 23: See notes following RCW 19.94.150.